Missouri, session 2026, HB2737.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 444.070, 444.090, 444.100, 444.110, 444.352, 444.765, 444.770,
444.771, 444.772, 444.773, and 444.786, RSMo, are repealed and seventeen new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 444.070, 444.090, 444.100, 444.110, 444.352,
444.765, 444.770, 444.771, 444.772, 444.773, 444.786, 444.791, 444.991, 444.992, 444.993,
444.994, and 444.995, to read as follows:
444.070. When any owner, tenant or subtenant of a lot or lots or tracts of land, shall
file with any associate circuit judge within the county in which said lot or lots or tract of land
may be situated, his or her affidavit, or the affidavit of any other credible person for them,
stating that from knowledge, information or belief, the party or parties owning, controlling or
working the adjoining lot or lots or tract of land, and upon which said party or parties are
sinking shafts, mining, excavating and running drifts, and that said drifts in which said parties
are digging, mining and excavating mineral ore or veins of coal or any other mineral as
defined under section 444.765 extend beyond the lines and boundaries of said lot or lots or
tract of land, owned, controlled or worked by them, and have entered in and upon the
premises of the party or parties making said affidavit, or for whom said affidavit is made, the
associate circuit judge, after first being tendered his lawful fees, shall issue his written order
and deliver or cause the same to be delivered to the county surveyor or his deputy,
commanding him, after his reasonable fees have been tendered, to proceed without delay to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2737 2
survey said drift by entering any and all shafts upon said lot or lots or tract of land that he (the
surveyor) may see fit, for the purpose of ascertaining the course and distance of said drift or
drifts, and to locate the same upon the surface.
444.090. If said party or parties owning, controlling or working said shaft or shafts on
said lot or lots or tract of land shall refuse, hinder or prevent said county surveyor or his
deputy and his assistant from entering said shaft or shafts or drifts, to make the survey so
ordered by the associate circuit judge, and every person so offending shall, on conviction, be
adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor, and punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term
of not exceeding one year, or by fine not exceeding [three hundred] one thousand dollars, or
by both said fine and imprisonment.
444.100. No person, company or corporation shall hereafter sink a shaft, mine,
tunnel, excavate or drift for coal, cobalt, rare earth elements, or silica sand or take out any
coal, cobalt, rare earth elements, or silica sand of any kind within the corporate limits or
designated boundaries of any city, town or village in this state containing one thousand
inhabitants or more, without having first applied and filed, and have approved, an indemnity
bond as provided for in this chapter; and any person or persons violating the provisions of this
section, and any member or stockholder or officer of any company or corporation who shall
violate the provisions of this section, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on
conviction thereof shall be punished by fine of not less than [five hundred] one thousand
dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail for not less than [six months] one year, or by both
such fine and imprisonment.
444.110. 1. In addition to the requirements in subsections 2 and 3 of this section,
the department of natural resources shall provide notice, as required under section
444.773, for all permits to mine minerals, as such term is defined under section 444.765.
2. Every person, company or corporation desiring to carry on any of the mining
operations provided for in section 444.100 shall give at least thirty days' notice of such
intention by notice printed and published in some newspaper printed in such town, city or
village wherein such mining operations are proposed to be carried on, or if no newspaper be
printed in such city, town or village, then in some newspaper printed in said county, or if no
newspaper be printed in such county, then by written or printed handbills posted up in six
public places in the city, town or village wherein such mining operations are proposed to be
carried on.
[2.] 3. Such notice shall contain an accurate description of the locality where such
mining operations are to be carried on, giving the number of lot and block, and shall also state
the nature of such mining operations, and name some day the circuit court in said county is in
session when such person, company or corporation will offer for filing and approval the
indemnity bond provided for in this chapter.

HB 2737 3
444.352. As used in sections 444.352 to 444.380, the following words and terms shall
mean:
(1) "Beneficiation", the process of concentrating minerals from ore;
(2) "Closure", those actions taken pursuant to a comprehensive plan to contain
metallic mineral wastes on site, ensure the integrity of waste management structures and
achieve the designated final uses of the metallic minerals waste management area;
(3) "Conference, conciliation and persuasion", a process of verbal or written
communications consisting of meetings, reports, correspondence or telephone conferences
between authorized representatives of the department and the alleged violator. The process
shall, at a minimum, consist of one offer to meet with the alleged violator tendered by the
department. During any such meeting, the department and the alleged violator shall negotiate
in good faith to eliminate the alleged violation and shall attempt to agree upon a plan to
achieve compliance;
(4) "Director", the director of the department of natural resources;
(5) "Disposal", the placing of metallic mineral wastes on or under the ground;
(6) "Facility", an integrated metallic mineral mine or mill complex or primary metal
smelter or refinery complex;
(7) "Inspection-maintenance", those actions taken after closure to maintain the waste
management area in accordance with a closure plan;
(8) "Metallic mineral waste", mine waste rock, mine water, tailings, chat, blast
furnace slag from primary lead smelters and pot liners from primary aluminum smelters,
which is disposed of and not put to beneficial use;
(9) "Metallic minerals", minerals or mineral ores containing lead, iron, zinc,
aluminum, copper, gold and silver;
(10) "Metallic minerals waste management areas" or "waste management areas",
those areas designated and used for the disposal of metallic mineral wastes from metallic
minerals mining, beneficiation and processing;
(11) "Mining", any activity conducted on or under the surface of the earth for the
extraction of metallic minerals or mineral ores from the earth;
(12) "Minor violation", a violation which possesses a small potential to harm the
environment or human health or cause pollution, was not knowingly committed, and is not
defined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as other than minor;
(13) "Operator", any person, firm, or corporation engaged in and controlling a
facility;
(14) "Person", any individual, partnership, copartnership, firm, company, public or
private corporation, association, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, or

HB 2737 4
any agency, board, department or bureau of the state or federal government, or any other legal
entity whatever, which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.
444.765. Wherever used or referred to in sections 444.760 to [444.790] 444.791,
unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms mean:
(1) "Affected land", the pit area or area from which overburden shall have been
removed, or upon which overburden has been deposited after September 28, 1971. When
mining is conducted underground, affected land means any excavation or removal of
overburden required to create access to mine openings, except that areas of disturbance
encompassed by the actual underground openings for air shafts, portals, adits and haul roads
in addition to disturbances within fifty feet of any openings for haul roads, portals or adits
shall not be considered affected land. Sites which exceed the excluded areas by more than
one acre for underground mining operations shall obtain a permit for the total extent of
affected lands with no exclusions as required under sections 444.760 to 444.790;
(2) "Beneficiation", the dressing or processing of minerals for the purpose of
regulating the size of the desired product, removing unwanted constituents, and improving the
quality or purity of a desired product;
(3) "Commercial purpose", the purpose of extracting minerals for their value in sales
to other persons or for incorporation into a product;
(4) "Commission", the Missouri mining commission in the department of natural
resources created by section 444.520;
(5) "Construction", construction, erection, alteration, maintenance, or repair of any
facility including but not limited to any building, structure, highway, road, bridge, viaduct,
water or sewer line, pipeline or utility line, and demolition, excavation, land clearance, and
moving of minerals or fill dirt in connection therewith;
(6) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(7) "Director", the staff director of the Missouri mining commission or his or her
designee;
(8) "Excavation", any operation in which earth, minerals, or other material in or on
the ground is moved, removed, or otherwise displaced for purposes of construction at the site
of excavation, by means of any tools, equipment, or explosives and includes, but is not
limited to, backfilling, grading, trenching, digging, ditching, drilling, well-drilling, auguring,
boring, tunneling, scraping, cable or pipe plowing, plowing-in, pulling-in, ripping, driving,
demolition of structures, and the use of high-velocity air to disintegrate and suction to remove
earth and other materials. For purposes of this section, excavation or removal of overburden
for purposes of mining for a commercial purpose or for purposes of reclamation of land
subjected to surface mining is not included in this definition. Neither shall excavations of

HB 2737 5
sand and gravel by political subdivisions using their own personnel and equipment or private
individuals for personal use be included in this definition;
(9) "Fill dirt", material removed from its natural location through mining or
construction activity, which is a mixture of unconsolidated earthy material, which may
include some minerals, and which is used to fill, raise, or level the surface of the ground at the
site of disposition, which may be at the site it was removed or on other property, and which is
not processed to extract mineral components of the mixture. Backfill material for use in
completing reclamation is not included in this definition;
(10) "Land improvement", work performed by or for a public or private owner or
lessor of real property for purposes of improving the suitability of the property for
construction at an undetermined future date, where specific plans for construction do not
currently exist;
(11) "Mineral", a constituent of the earth in a solid state which, when extracted from
the earth, is usable in its natural form or is capable of conversion into a usable form as a
chemical, an energy source, or raw material for manufacturing or construction material. For
the purposes of this section, this definition includes metallic minerals as defined under
section 444.352, barite, tar sands, oil shales, cadmium, barium, nickel, cobalt, molybdenum,
germanium, gallium, tellurium, selenium, vanadium, indium, mercury, uranium, rare earth
elements, platinum group elements, manganese, phosphorus, sodium, titanium, zirconium,
lithium, thorium, [or] tungsten, and silica sand as defined under section 444.991; but does
not include [iron, lead, zinc, gold, silver,] coal, surface or subsurface water, fill dirt, natural
oil, or gas together with other chemicals recovered therewith;
(12) "Mining", the removal of overburden and extraction of underlying minerals or
the extraction of minerals from exposed natural deposits for a commercial purpose, as defined
by this section;
(13) "Operator", any person, firm or corporation engaged in and controlling a surface
mining operation;
(14) "Overburden", all of the earth and other materials which lie above natural
deposits of minerals; and also means such earth and other materials disturbed from their
natural state in the process of surface mining other than what is defined in subdivision (10) of
this section;
(15) "Peak", a projecting point of overburden created in the surface mining process;
(16) "Pit", the place where minerals are being or have been mined by surface mining;
(17) "Political subdivision", any city, town, village, county, or other political
entity created by law;

HB 2737 6
(18) "Public entity", the state or any officer, official, authority, board, or commission
of the state and any county, city, or other political subdivision of the state, or any institution
supported in whole or in part by public funds;
[(18)] (19) "Rare earth element", any of a group of seventeen elements on the
periodic table, including yttrium, lanthanum, scandium, cerium, dysprosium, terbium,
praseodymium, neodymium, promethium, ytterbium, europium, samarium, lutetium,
gadolinium, holmium, thulium, and erbium;
(20) "Refuse", all waste material directly connected with the cleaning and preparation
of substance mined by surface mining;
[(19)] (21) "Ridge", a lengthened elevation of overburden created in the surface
mining process;
[(20)] (22) "Site" or "mining site", any location or group of associated locations
separated by a natural barrier where minerals are being surface mined by the same operator;
[(21)] (23) "Surface mining", the mining of minerals for commercial purposes by
removing the overburden lying above natural deposits thereof, and mining directly from the
natural deposits thereby exposed, and shall include mining of exposed natural deposits of
such minerals over which no overburden lies and, after August 28, 1990, the surface effects of
underground mining operations for such minerals. For purposes of the provisions of sections
444.760 to 444.790, surface mining shall not include excavations to move minerals or fill dirt
within the confines of the real property where excavation occurs or to remove minerals or fill
dirt from the real property in preparation for construction at the site of excavation. No
excavation of fill dirt shall be deemed surface mining regardless of the site of disposition or
whether construction occurs at the site of excavation;
(24) "Wildlife refuges", specific areas within the state that contain physical or
biological features that are essential to the conservation of endangered and threatened
species and that may need specific management or protection.
444.770. 1. It shall be unlawful for any operator to engage in surface mining without
first obtaining from the commission a permit to do so, in such form as is hereinafter provided,
including any operator involved in any gravel mining operation where the annual tonnage of
gravel mined by such operator is less than five thousand tons, except as provided in
subsection 2 of this section.
2. (1) A property owner or operator conducting gravel removal at the request of a
property owner for the primary purpose of managing seasonal gravel accretion on property
not used primarily for gravel mining, or a political subdivision who contracts with an operator
for excavation to obtain sand and gravel material solely for the use of such political
subdivision shall be exempt from obtaining a permit as required in subsection 1 of this
section. Such gravel removal shall be conducted solely on the property owner's or political

HB 2737 7
subdivision's property and shall be in accordance with department guidelines, rules, and
regulations. The property owner shall notify the department before any person or operator
conducts gravel removal from the property owner's property if the gravel is sold. Notification
shall include the nature of the activity, name of the county and stream in which the site is
located and the property owner's name. The property owner shall not be required to notify the
department regarding any gravel removal at each site location for up to one year from the
original notification regarding that site. The property owner shall renotify the department
before any person or operator conducts gravel removal at any site after the expiration of one
year from the previous notification regarding that site. At the time of each notification to the
department, the department shall provide the property owner with a copy of the department's
guidelines, rules, and regulations relevant to the activity reported. Said guidelines, rules and
regulations may be transmitted either by mail or via the internet.
(2) The annual tonnage of gravel mined by such property owner or operator
conducting gravel removal at the request of a property owner shall be less than two thousand
tons, with a site limitation of one thousand tons annually. Any operator conducting gravel
removal at the request of a property owner that has removed two thousand tons of sand and
gravel material within one calendar year shall have a watershed management practice plan
approved by the commission in order to remove any future sand or gravel material the
remainder of the calendar year. The application for approval shall be accompanied by an
application fee equivalent to the fee paid under section 444.772 and shall contain the name of
the watershed from which the operator will be conducting sand and gravel removal, the
location within the watershed district that the sand and gravel will be removed, and the
description of the vehicles and equipment used for removal. Upon approval of the watershed
management practice plan, the department shall provide a copy of the relevant commission
regulations to the operator.
(3) No property owner or operator conducting gravel removal at the request of a
property owner for the primary purpose of managing seasonal gravel accretion on property
not used primarily for gravel mining shall conduct gravel removal from any site located
within a distance, to be determined by the commission and included in the guidelines, rules,
and regulations given to the property owner at the time of notification, of any building,
structure, highway, road, bridge, viaduct, water or sewer line, and pipeline or utility line.
3. Sections 444.760 to 444.790 shall apply only to those areas which are opened on or
after January 1, 1972, or to the extended portion of affected areas extended after that date.
The effective date of this section for minerals not previously covered under the provisions of
sections 444.760 to 444.790 shall be August 28, 1990.
4. All surface mining operations where land is affected after September 28, 1971,
which are under the control of any government agency whose regulations are equal to or

HB 2737 8
greater than those imposed by section 444.774, are not subject to the further provisions of
sections 444.760 to 444.790, except that such operations shall be registered with the Missouri
mining commission.
5. Any portion of a surface mining operation which is subject to the provisions of
sections 260.200 to 260.245 and the regulations promulgated thereunder, shall not be subject
to the provisions of sections 444.760 to 444.790, and any bonds or portions thereof applicable
to such operations shall be promptly released by the commission, and the associated permits
cancelled by the commission upon presentation to it of satisfactory evidence that the operator
has received a permit pursuant to section 260.205 and the regulations promulgated
thereunder. Any land reclamation bond associated with such released permits shall be
retained by the commission until presentation to the commission of satisfactory evidence that:
(1) The operator has complied with sections 260.226 and 260.227, and the regulations
promulgated thereunder, pertaining to closure and postclosure plans and financial assurance
instruments; and
(2) The operator has commenced operation of the solid waste disposal area or sanitary
landfill as those terms are defined in chapter 260.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, any political
subdivision which uses its own personnel and equipment or any private individual for
personal use may conduct in-stream gravel operations without obtaining from the commission
a permit to conduct such an activity.
7. Any person filing a complaint of an alleged violation of this section with the
department shall identify themself by name and telephone number, provide the date and
location of the violation, and provide adequate information, as determined by the department,
that there has been a violation. [Any] Records, statements, or communications submitted by
any person to the department relevant to the complaint shall [remain confidential and used
solely by the department to investigate such alleged violation] be available by request under
the Missouri sunshine law contained in chapter 610 with personally identifiable
information of the complainant redacted.
8. Beginning August 28, 2026, no person shall engage in or carry out a mining
operation for minerals within the state unless the person has first obtained a permit
from the director. Any person who is engaged in or carrying out a mining operation
before August 28, 2026, and who will continue such operation after such date shall be
required to apply for a permit before March 1, 2027. Any such mining operation may
continue to mine metallic minerals while such application is pending. Persons engaged
in or carrying out a mining operation with an existing permit shall be exempt from the
new permit conditions until their existing permit expires and they seek renewal. The
person applying for a permit shall apply on forms prescribed by the director and shall

HB 2737 9
submit such information as the director may require including, but not limited to, a
proposed plan for the reclamation or restoration, or both, of any mining area affected
by the mining operations to be conducted.
9. Before October 1, 2026, the director, in consultation with the department of
conservation and political subdivisions, shall develop model standards and criteria for
mining, processing, and transporting minerals as defined in section 444.765. The
standards and criteria may be used by political subdivisions in developing local
ordinances that reflect the needs of different geographic areas of the state. The
standards and criteria developed shall reflect those differences in various regions of the
state. The standards and criteria shall include:
(1) Recommendations for setback or buffer distances, in addition to any setback
or buffer distances required under section 444.771, that shall apply with respect to the
following:
(a) Any residence or residential zoning district boundary;
100 (b) Any property line or right-of-way line of any existing or proposed street or
101 highway;
102 (c) Ordinary high-water levels of public waters;
103 (d) Bluffs;
104 (e) Surface waters;
105 (f) Private wells;
106 (g) Wildlife refuges; and
107 (h) A natural resource easement paid wholly or in part by public funds;
108 (2) Standards for hours of operation;
109 (3) Air monitoring and data submission requirements;
110 (4) Dust control requirements;
111 (5) Noise testing and mitigation plan requirements;
112 (6) Blast monitoring plan requirements;
113 (7) Lighting requirements;
114 (8) Inspection requirements;
115 (9) Containment requirements for silica sand in temporary storage to protect air
116 and water quality;
117 (10) Containment requirements for chemicals used in processing;
118 (11) Financial assurance requirements;
119 (12) Road and bridge impacts and requirements; and
120 (13) Reclamation plan requirements as required under the rules adopted by the
121 director of natural resources.

HB 2737 10
122 10. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a political subdivision
123 may enact or extend a local ordinance that prohibits new or expanded mining
124 operations without challenge from the state as it is in the best interest of local public
125 welfare to allow local governments to make such determinations.
126 11. Permit holders shall submit a report annually to the department that
127 includes, but is not limited to:
128 (1) The name and business address of the permit holder;
129 (2) The addresses of each tract of land from which the permit holder conducted
130 mining activities;
131 (3) The volume of each type of mineral mined from each tract of land governed
132 by the permit;
133 (4) The practices used to minimize light and noise pollution, and minimize
134 degradation to the surrounding community's air quality, water quality, public roads,
135 scenic bluffs, and other landscapes;
136 (5) Data collected from groundwater, surface water, and air monitoring plans as
137 required by section 444.771;
138 (6) The total annual volume of emissions released of each greenhouse gas from
139 the mining facilities; and
140 (7) The total annual volume of discharge into adjacent bodies of water by
141 pollutant type.
444.771. [Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commission
and the department shall not issue any permits under this chapter or under chapters 643or 644
to any person whose mine plan boundary is within one thousand feet of any real property
where an accredited school has been located for at least five years prior to such application for
permits made under these provisions, except that the provisions of this section shall not apply
to any request for an expansion to an existing mine or to any underground mining operation]
No excavation or mining of any mineral including, but not limited to, digging,
excavating, mining, drilling, blasting, tunneling, dredging, stripping, or shafting, shall
occur within one mile of any wildlife refuge designated by the Missouri conservation
commission under 3 CSR 10-12.105, surface water as defined under section 640.403,
state conservation area, state park, public land as defined by 43 U.S.C. Section 1702(e),
park in the National Parks System under 54 U.S.C. Section 100101 et seq., residence, or
school. No operation that refines cobalt, lithium, rare earth elements, lead, zinc, nickel,
cadmium, manganese, iron, or silver, or manufactures or recycles products that contain
these elements shall occur within one mile of any wildlife refuge designated by the
Missouri conservation commission under 3 CSR 10-12.105, surface water as defined
under section 640.403, state conservation area, state park, public land as defined by 43

HB 2737 11
U.S.C. Section 1702(e), park in the National Parks System under 54 U.S.C. Section
100101 et seq., residence, or school. This section shall not apply to mines, refineries,
manufacturing plants, or recycling plants in full operation on August 28, 2026.
444.772. 1. Any operator desiring to engage in [surface] mining shall make written
application to the director for a permit.
2. The director shall require proof of notice as required under section 444.110
upon accepting an application for a new or expanding mining permit. The department
shall accept written comments from the public for sixty days after receipt of an
application for permit.
3. Application for permit shall be made on a form prescribed by the commission and
shall include:
(1) The name of all persons with any interest in the land to be mined;
(2) The source of the applicant's legal right to mine the land affected by the permit;
(3) The permanent and temporary post office address of the applicant;
(4) Whether the applicant or any person associated with the applicant holds or has
held any other permits pursuant to sections 444.500 to 444.790, and an identification of such
permits;
(5) The written consent of the applicant and any other persons necessary to grant
access to the commission or the director to the area of land affected under application from
the date of application until the expiration of any permit granted under the application and
thereafter for such time as is necessary to assure compliance with all provisions of sections
444.500 to 444.790 or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to them. Permit
applications submitted by operators who mine an annual tonnage of less than ten thousand
tons shall be required to include written consent from the operator to grant access to the
commission or the director to the area of land affected;
(6) A description of the tract or tracts of land and the estimated number of acres
thereof to be affected by the [surface] mining of the applicant for the next succeeding twelve
months; [and]
(7) The nature and extent of the proposed work, including the type of minerals
sought to be mined and the mining practices sought to be used for each type of mineral;
and
(8) Such other information that the commission may require as such information
applies to land reclamation.
[3.] 4. The application for a permit shall be accompanied by a map in a scale and form
specified by the commission by regulation.
5. Any mining permit applicant shall submit a mine plan with its permit
application with the following information:

HB 2737 12
(1) A hydrogeological evaluation and any other information necessary for the
director to assess potential impacts to hydrogeological features, including private and
public drinking water supply wells;
(2) The results of an assessment of the water resources needed for the operation,
how much of that water need is available onsite, and the impacts those water needs will
have on the surrounding surface and groundwater resources;
(3) Any adverse short-term and long-term environmental consequences that
cannot be avoided should the work be performed;
(4) Potential hazards of the proposed mine, including dust, mine gases, or toxic
vapors escaping from the mine, and the potential for mine fires and water
contamination that may result from operation of the mine;
(5) A conservation plan as required by section 444.772 detailing the methods,
using best available technology, the proposed operation will use to:
(a) Minimize light and noise pollution, and minimize degradation to the
surrounding community's air quality, water quality, water quantity, public roads, scenic
bluffs, and other landscapes;
(b) Minimize the impact on the HUC-8 watershed in which the proposed mining
operation is located;
(c) Reduce and mitigate impacts on biodiversity and greenhouse gas emissions
from mining activities; and
(d) Reduce and mitigate other public health and worker harms that can result
from mining the specific minerals intended by the mining permit applicant; and
(6) Plans for monitoring air quality and groundwater and surface water quality
and quantity.
[4.] 6. The application shall be accompanied by a bond, security or certificate meeting
the requirements of section 444.778, a geologic resources fee authorized under section
256.700, and a permit fee approved by the commission not to exceed one thousand dollars.
The commission may also require a fee for each site listed on a permit not to exceed four
hundred dollars for each site. If mining operations are not conducted at a site for six months
or more during any year, the fee for such site for that year shall be reduced by fifty percent.
The commission may also require a fee for each acre bonded by the operator pursuant to
section 444.778 not to exceed twenty dollars per acre. If such fee is assessed, the per-acre fee
on all acres bonded by a single operator that exceed a total of two hundred acres shall be
reduced by fifty percent. In no case shall the total fee for any permit be more than three
thousand dollars. Permit and renewal fees shall be established by rule, except for the initial
fees as set forth in this subsection, and shall be set at levels that recover the cost of
administering and enforcing sections 444.760 to 444.790, making allowances for grants and

HB 2737 13
other sources of funds. The director shall submit a report to the commission and the public
each year that describes the number of employees and the activities performed the previous
calendar year to administer sections 444.760 to 444.790. For any operator of a gravel mining
operation where the annual tonnage of gravel mined by such operator is less than five
thousand tons, the total cost of submitting an application shall be three hundred dollars. The
issued permit shall be valid from the date of its issuance until the date specified in the mine
plan unless sooner revoked or suspended as provided in sections 444.760 to 444.790.
Beginning August 28, 2007, the fees shall be set at a permit fee of eight hundred dollars, a site
fee of four hundred dollars, and an acre fee of ten dollars, with a maximum fee of three
thousand dollars. Fees may be raised as allowed in this subsection after a regulation change
that demonstrates the need for increased fees.
[5.] 7. An operator desiring to have his or her permit amended to cover additional
land may file an amended application with the commission. Upon receipt of the amended
application, and such additional fee and bond as may be required pursuant to the provisions of
sections 444.760 to 444.790, the director shall, if the applicant complies with all applicable
regulatory requirements, issue an amendment to the original permit covering the additional
land described in the amended application.
[6.] 8. An operation may withdraw any land covered by a permit, excepting affected
land, by notifying the commission thereof, in which case the penalty of the bond or security
filed by the operator pursuant to the provisions of sections 444.760 to 444.790 shall be
reduced proportionately.
[7.] 9. Where mining or reclamation operations on acreage for which a permit has
been issued have not been completed, the permit shall be renewed. The operator shall submit
a permit renewal form furnished by the director for an additional permit year and pay a fee
equal to an application fee calculated pursuant to subsection 4 of this section, but in no case
shall the renewal fee for any operator be more than three thousand dollars. For any operator
involved in any gravel mining operation where the annual tonnage of gravel mined by such
operator is less than five thousand tons, the permit as to such acreage shall be renewed by
100 applying on a permit renewal form furnished by the director for an additional permit year and
101 payment of a fee of three hundred dollars. Upon receipt of the completed permit renewal
102 form and fee from the operator, the director shall approve the renewal. With approval of the
103 director and operator, the permit renewal may be extended for a portion of an additional year
104 with a corresponding prorating of the renewal fee.
105 [8.] 10. Where one operator succeeds another at any uncompleted operation, either by
106 sale, assignment, lease or otherwise, the commission may release the first operator from all
107 liability pursuant to sections 444.760 to 444.790 as to that particular operation if both
108 operators have been issued a permit and have otherwise complied with the requirements of

HB 2737 14
109 sections 444.760 to 444.790 and the successor operator assumes as part of his or her
110 obligation pursuant to sections 444.760 to 444.790 all liability for the reclamation of the area
111 of land affected by the former operator.
112 [9.] 11. The application for a permit shall be accompanied by a plan of reclamation
113 that meets the requirements of sections 444.760 to 444.790 and the rules and regulations
114 promulgated pursuant thereto, and shall contain a verified statement by the operator setting
115 forth the proposed method of operation, reclamation, and a conservation plan for the affected
116 area including approximate dates and time of completion, and stating that the operation will
117 meet the requirements of sections 444.760 to 444.790, and any rule or regulation promulgated
118 pursuant to them.
119 [10. At the time that a permit application is deemed complete by the director,] 12.
120 Within one week of the submission of a permit application to the director, the proposed
121 operator shall publish a notice of [intent to operate a surface mine] the permit application:
122 (1) In any newspaper qualified pursuant to section 493.050 to publish legal notices in
123 any county where the land is located; or
124 (2) On the official website of the county where the land is located. [If the director
125 does not respond to a permit application within forty-five calendar days, the application shall
126 be deemed to be complete.]
127
128 Notice in the newspaper shall be posted once a week for four consecutive weeks beginning no
129 more than ten days after the application is [deemed complete] submitted to the director, or
130 if notice is published on the county website, such notice shall remain on the website for a
131 period of four weeks. The operator shall also send notice of [intent to operate a surface
132 mine] the permit applicationby certified mail to the governing body of the counties or cities
133 in which the proposed area is located, and to the last known addresses of all record
134 landowners whose property is:
135 [(1)] (a) Within [two thousand six hundred forty feet, or one-half] one mile from the
136 border of the proposed mine plan area; and
137 [(2)] (b) Adjacent to the proposed mine plan area, land upon which the mine plan area
138 is located, or adjacent land having a legal relationship with either the applicant or the owner
139 of the land upon which the mine plan area is located.
140
141 The notices shall include the name and address of the operator, a legal description consisting
142 of county, section, township and range, the number of acres involved, a statement that the
143 operator plans to mine a specified mineral during a specified time, and the address of the
144 commission. The notices shall also contain a statement that any person with a direct, personal
145 interest in one or more of the factors the director may consider in issuing a permit may

HB 2737 15
146 request a public meeting [or file written comments] to the director no later than [fifteen]
147 thirty days following the final public notice publication date. If any person requests a public
148 meeting, the applicant shall cooperate with the director in making all necessary arrangements
149 for the public meeting to be held in a reasonably convenient location and at a reasonable time
150 for interested participants, and the applicant shall bear the expenses.
151 [11.] 13. The director may approve a permit application or permit amendment whose
152 operation or reclamation plan deviates from the requirements of sections 444.760 to 444.790
153 if it can be demonstrated by the operator that the conditions present at the [surface] mining
154 location warrant an exception. The criteria accepted for consideration when evaluating the
155 merits of an exception or variance to the requirements of sections 444.760 to 444.790 shall be
156 established by regulations.
157 [12.] 14. Fees imposed pursuant to this section shall become effective August 28,
158 2007, and shall expire on December 31, 2030. No other provisions of this section shall
159 expire.
444.773. 1. All applications for a permit shall be filed with the director [, who shall
promptly investigate the application and make a decision within six weeks after completion of
the process provided in subsection 10 of section 444.772 to issue or deny the permit] with all
materials required under section 444.772. If the director determines that the application
has not fully complied with the provisions of section 444.772 or any rule or regulation
promulgated pursuant to that section, the director may seek additional information from the
applicant before making a decision to issue or deny the permit. The director shall publish
the permit application and allow for public comment under section 444.110. The director
shall consider [any] all public comments when making the decision to issue or deny the
permit. In issuing a permit, the director may impose reasonable conditions consistent with the
provisions of sections 444.760 to 444.790. The director's decision shall be deemed to be the
decision of the director of the department of natural resources and shall be subject to appeal to
the administrative hearing commission as provided by sections 640.013 and 621.250.
2. Whenever a [surface] mining operation permit provided under section 444.772 is
issued, denied, suspended, or revoked by the department of natural resources, any aggrieved
person, by petition filed with the administrative hearing commission within thirty days of the
decision, may appeal such decision as provided by sections 621.250 and 640.013. For
purposes of an appeal, the administrative hearing commission may consider, based on
competent and substantial scientific evidence on the record, whether an interested party's
health, safety or livelihood will be unduly impaired by the issuance, denial, suspension, or
revocation of the permit. The administrative hearing commission may also consider, based on
competent and substantial scientific evidence on the record, whether the operator has
demonstrated, during the five-year period immediately preceding the date of the permit

HB 2737 16
application, a pattern of noncompliance at other locations in Missouri that suggests a
reasonable likelihood of future acts of noncompliance. In determining whether a reasonable
likelihood of noncompliance will exist in the future, the administrative hearing commission
may look to past acts of noncompliance in Missouri, but only to the extent they suggest a
reasonable likelihood of future acts of noncompliance. Such past acts of noncompliance in
Missouri, in and of themselves, are an insufficient basis to suggest a reasonable likelihood of
future acts of noncompliance. In addition, such past acts shall not be used as a basis to
suggest a reasonable likelihood of future acts of noncompliance unless the noncompliance has
caused or has the potential to cause, a risk to human health or to the environment, or has
caused or has potential to cause pollution, or was knowingly committed, or is defined by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency as other than minor. If a hearing petitioner
demonstrates or the administrative hearing commission finds either present acts of
noncompliance or a reasonable likelihood that the permit seeker or the operations of
associated persons or corporations in Missouri will be in noncompliance in the future, such a
showing will satisfy the noncompliance requirement in this subsection. In addition, such
basis must be developed by multiple noncompliances of any environmental law administered
by the Missouri department of natural resources at any single facility in Missouri that resulted
in harm to the environment or impaired the health, safety or livelihood of persons outside the
facility. For any permit seeker that has not been in business in Missouri for the past five
years, the administrative hearing commission may review the record of noncompliance in any
state where the applicant has conducted business during the past five years. The
administrative hearing commission shall issue a recommended decision to the commission on
permit issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation. The commission shall issue its own
decision, based on the appeal, for permit issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation. If the
commission changes a finding of fact or conclusion of law made by the administrative
hearing commission, or modifies or vacates the decision recommended by the administrative
hearing commission, it shall issue its own decision, which shall include findings of fact and
conclusions of law. The commission shall mail copies of its final decision to the parties to the
appeal or their counsel of record. The commission's decision shall be subject to judicial
review pursuant to chapter 536, except that the court of appeals district with territorial
jurisdiction coextensive with the county where the mine is located or is to be located shall
have original jurisdiction. No judicial review shall be available until and unless all
administrative remedies are exhausted.
444.786. Any person required by sections 444.760 to 444.790 to have a permit who
engages in the mining of minerals without previously securing a permit to do so as prescribed
by sections 444.760 to 444.790, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall
be fined not less than [fifty] five thousand dollars nor more than [one] ten thousand dollars.

HB 2737 17
Each day of operation without the permit required by sections 444.760 to 444.790 will be
deemed a separate violation.
444.791. Before October 1, 2027, the director, in consultation with political
subdivisions, shall establish and maintain a database on political subdivision ordinances
and political subdivision permits that have been approved for regulation of mining
projects for reference by other political subdivisions and the public.
444.991. As used in sections 444.991 to 444.995, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(2) "Director", the staff director of the Missouri mining commission or his or
her designee;
(3) "Processing", washing, cleaning, screening, crushing, filtering, sorting,
processing, stockpiling, and storing silica sand, either at the mining site or at any other
site;
(4) "Silica sand", well-rounded, sand-sized grains of quartz (silicon dioxide)
with few impurities in terms of other minerals. The term "silica sand" for the purposes
of sections 444.070 to 444.995 refers to quartz that is commercially valuable for use in
the hydraulic fracturing of shale to obtain oil and natural gas. Silica sand does not
include common rock, stone, aggregate, gravel, sand with a low quartz level, or silica
compounds recovered as a by-product of metallic mining;
(5) "Silica sand project", the mining, processing, and transportation of silica
sand by rail, barge, truck, or other means;
(6) "Temporary storage", the storage of stockpiles of silica sand that have been
transported and await further transport;
(7) "Transporting", hauling and transporting silica sand by any carrier:
(a) From the mining site to a processing or transfer site; or
(b) From a processing or storage site to a rail car, barge, or transfer site for
transporting to destinations.
444.992. 1. Beginning August 28, 2027, any mining permit applicant for a
project involving silica sand shall prepare and submit to the director an environmental
assessment worksheet if the project:
(1) Excavates twenty or more acres of land to a mean depth of ten feet or more
during its existence; or
(2) Is designed to store or is capable of storing more than seven thousand five
hundred tons of silica sand or has an annual throughput of more than two hundred
thousand tons of silica sand.

HB 2737 18
2. The director shall develop an environmental assessment worksheet that the
applicant shall complete and the applicant shall provide the following information in the
worksheet:
(1) A hydrogeologic investigation assessing potential groundwater and surface
water effects and geologic conditions that could create an increased risk of potentially
significant effects on groundwater and surface water;
(2) An air quality impact assessment that includes an assessment of the potential
effects from airborne particulates and dust;
(3) A traffic impact analysis, including documentation of existing transportation
systems, analysis of the potential effects of the project on transportation, and mitigation
measures to eliminate or minimize adverse impacts;
(4) An assessment of compatibility of the project with other existing uses; and
(5) Mitigation measures that could eliminate or minimize adverse environmental
effects for the project.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply to new applications and any application for
a permit renewal submitted on or after August 28, 2026.
444.993. 1. Beginning August 28, 2027, any applicant for a mining permit for a
project that involves the mining of cobalt shall prepare and submit to the director an
environmental assessment worksheet under this section due to the significant health and
environmental impacts of cobalt extraction, including cancerous and noncancerous
human toxicity, eutrophication, freshwater ecotoxicity, land degradation, ozone
depletion, and increased occurrence of extreme weather events.
2. The director shall develop an environmental assessment worksheet that all
applicants for cobalt mining projects shall complete and the applicants shall provide
information in the worksheet including, but not limited to:
(1) A hydrogeologic investigation assessing potential groundwater and surface
water effects and geologic conditions that could create an increased risk of potentially
significant effects on groundwater and surface water;
(2) An assessment outlining toxicity exposure risks to all mine employees and to
all residents within three miles of the proposed mining site, considering the transport of
toxins in the air, surface water, and groundwater;
(3) An air quality impact assessment that includes an assessment of the potential
effects from airborne particulates and dust;
(4) A traffic impact analysis, including documentation of existing transportation
systems, analysis of the potential effects of the project on transportation, and mitigation
measures to eliminate or minimize adverse impacts;

HB 2737 19
(5) An assessment of compatibility of the project with other existing uses; and
(6) Mitigation measures that could eliminate or minimize any adverse
environmental effects of the project.
444.994. 1. Beginning August 28, 2027, any applicant for a mining permit for a
project that involves the mining of a rare earth element shall prepare and submit to the
director an environmental assessment worksheet under this section due to the
significant health and environmental impacts of rare earth element extraction,
including human toxicity due to exposure to carcinogens in air emissions and heavy
metals and radioactive compounds in wastewater discharge.
2. The director shall develop an environmental assessment worksheet that all
applicants for rare earth element mining projects shall complete and the applicants shall
provide information in the worksheet including, but not limited to:
(1) A hydrogeologic investigation assessing potential groundwater and surface
water effects and geologic conditions that could create an increased risk of potentially
significant effects on groundwater and surface water;
(2) An assessment outlining toxicity exposure risks to all mine employees and to
all residents within three miles of the proposed mining site, considering the transport of
toxins in the air, surface water, and groundwater;
(3) An air quality impact assessment that includes an assessment of the potential
effects from airborne particulates and dust;
(4) A traffic impact analysis, including documentation of existing transportation
systems, analysis of the potential effects of the project on transportation, and mitigation
measures to eliminate or minimize adverse impacts;
(5) An assessment of compatibility of the project with other existing uses; and
(6) Mitigation measures that could eliminate or minimize any adverse
environmental effects of the project.
444.995. 1. The director shall adopt rules pertaining to the control of particulate
emissions from mining operations involving silica sand, cobalt, rare earth elements,
iron, and lead.
2. The director shall adopt rules pertaining to the reclamation of mines involving
silica sand, cobalt, rare earth elements, iron, and lead.
3. Before January 1, 2027, the department of health and senior services shall
adopt an air quality health-based value for silica sand, cobalt, rare earth elements, iron,
and lead.
4. Before January 1, 2027, the director shall adopt rules pertaining to the
liability of mine operators and mine landowners for radioactive waste transport into
soils, air, and water sources that can harm human health.

HB 2737 20
5. The director shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔